src/fst/phonology.twolc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== 
!! # South Sámi morphophonological rule set                   
! ========================================================================== 

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

! twol-sma.txt
! The file contains the rule set for the non-segmental
! South Sámi morphophonological rules

Alphabet
  a b c d e e9:e f g h i ï j k l m n o o9:o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å '
  A B C D E      F G H I Ï J K L M N O      P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ä Ø Ö Å

  Á É Í Ó Ú À È Ì Ò Ù Ë Ï Ü Â Ê Î Ô Û Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð Đ   º   Ç Ŋ Ŧ Č Ž
  á é í ó ú à è ì ò ù ë ï ü â ê î ô û ã ý þ ñ ð đ ß ª ß ç ŋ ŧ č ž 

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! 

  
  %-

 %  ! Space

! Morpheme boundaries:
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
 %< ! Inflectional prefix
 %> ! Inflectional suffix
 #  ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 #:%-! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds, alternatively
     ! realised as a hyphen; this is what we understand many wants.
 %^ ! (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
 %|» ! clitic boundary

! + = metric foot boundary (is it used any more?)

! Triggers:
  X2:0     ! Trigger for e:0 before suffix i
! Dette gjelder for verbklasse.5-6, hvor e--> i
  X3:0     ! Trigger for e->i in even syllabic verbs Du3
  X4:0     ! Trigger for e->i in even syllabic verbs Du2 & Pl12
  
  
! Tåamma, det er disse triggere jeg mener: Trigger for verbklasse 1-2: Ja nå funker 1-2, men nå feiler 5-6, vi må ha ulike triggere for 1-2 og 5-6-klasse verbene. Kan dere hjelpe meg med dette?



  
! xxx - X3 og X4 kan slåast i hop, det er ingen grunn til å ha to triggarar for den same endringa.

  %^DISIMP:0
  %^COMPDISIMP:0
  %^COMPDISIMP2:0
  %^COMPDISIMP3:0
  %^PLCDISIMP:0
  %^NOMAGieDISIMP:0
  %^1UML:0 %^2UML:0
  %^3UML:0
  %^4UML:0
  %^3sUML:0
  %^3dUML:0
  %^iæUML:0
  %^iUML:0
  %^PASSUML:0
  %^didhUML:0
  %^adteUML:0
  %^htjidhUML:0
  %^aLATUS:a
  %^uLATUS:e    !
  %^ConsDel:0
  %^ILLELA:0    ! stammevokal endrer seg i Illativ og Elativ
  %^COMESS:0    ! stammevokal endrer seg i Comitativ og Essiv
  %^PLGENPLCOM:0 ! e --> e --> i i Pl+Gen og i Pl+Com
  ;

Sets
  Letter = a b c d e f g h i ï j k l m n o o9 p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å '
           A B C D E F G H I Ï J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Ä Æ Ä Æ Å ;
  Cns    =   b c d   f g h     j k l m n   p q r s t   v w x   z  '         
             B C D   F G H     J K L M N   P Q R S T   V W X   Z           ;

  CJV    =   b c d   f g h       k l m n   p q r s t     w x   z           
             B C D   F G H     J K L M N   P Q R S T   V W X   Z           ;
  Vow    = a       e       i ï           o    o9       u       y   æ ä ø ö å 
           A       E       I Ï           O           U       Y   Ä Æ Ä Æ Å ;
  DobCons = s m ;
!  Bound   = # %> ;
!  WordBound = # ;
  DomainBound = # %+ ;

Definitions

  Triggers =
    %^DISIMP:
    %^COMPDISIMP:
    %^COMPDISIMP2:
    %^COMPDISIMP3:
    %^PLCDISIMP:
    %^NOMAGieDISIMP:
    %^1UML:
    %^2UML:
    %^3UML:
    %^3sUML:
    %^3dUML:
    %^iæUML:
    %^PASSUML:    !
    %^didhUML:
    %^adteUML:    !
    %^htjidhUML:
    %^aLATUS:
    %^uLATUS:
    %^ConsDel:   ! 
    %^ILLELA:    ! stammevokal endrer seg i Illativ og Elativ
    %^COMESS:    ! stammevokal endrer seg i Comitativ og Essiv
    ;

!! # Rules

Rules
 
"e deletion before i-initial suffix"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
   e:0 <=> _ X2:0 i: ;
   

!!€ manneX2ine
!!€ mann00ine

!
! Odd-syllabic verbs and nouns: 

"Diphthong simplification ie:e"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
   i:0 <=>       _ e  Cns+ (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP: ;
                 _ e           (%>:) %^DISIMP:      Cns+   ;
                 _ e           (%>:) %^COMPDISIMP: [b:|m:] ;
                 _ e   (l:)     m:  (%>:) %^COMPDISIMP3: e: ;!%> =morfemgrense

           (%»:) _ e: Cns+      %»:  %^adteUML: ;


!!€ dåeried%>%^DISIMPem
!!€ dåer0ed%>0em

!!$ dåeried%>%^DISIMPem
!!$ dåeried%>0em

!!€ gieriehtse%>%^DISIMPm
!!€ gier0ehtse%>0m

!!$ gieriehtse%>%^DISIMPm
!!$ gieriehtse%>0m

!!€ gijmie%>%^COMPDISIMPbe
!!€ gijm0e%>0be

!!$ gijmie%>%^COMPDISIMPbe
!!$ gijmie%>0be



! oe-ie


"Diphthong simplification oe:o"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
   e:0 <=> o _ Cns+     (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP:              ;
           o _ (l:) (m:)    (%>:) %^COMPDISIMP2: [b:|m:] ;!%> =morfemgrense
           o _ (l:)  m:     (%>:) %^COMPDISIMP3:  e:     ;!%> =morfemgrense



!!€ daaroest%>%^DISIMPem
!!€ daaro0st%>0em

!!$ daaroest%>%^DISIMPem
!!$ daaroest%>0em

!!€ gaaloehke%>%^DISIMPm
!!€ gaalo0hke%>0m

!!$ gaaloehke%>%^DISIMPm
!!$ gaaloehke%>0m


"Diphthong simplification oe:e" !in comparatives
   o:0 <=>       _ e     (%>:) %^COMPDISIMP: [b:|m:] ;
           (%»:) _ e Cns+ %»:  %^adteUML: ;


!!€ jearkoe%>%^COMPDISIMPbe
!!€ jeark0e%>0be

!!$ jearkoe%>%^COMPDISIMPbe
!!$ jearkoe%>0be

! ADJ - 


"a/e alternation"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
   a:e <=>            _ [ Cns - j | %»: t j | h [ t | k ] ] (Cns) (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP: ; ! original
!   a:e <=> Vow Cns+  _ [ Cns - j | %»: t j | h [ t | k ] ] (Cns) (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP: ; ! 3syll
!   a:e <=>           _  Cns+ (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP: ; ! Denne gjev overgenerering, men ser rett ut, lingv. sett.
                      _                                   (%>:)     %^COMPDISIMP: [b:|m:|l:] ;
                      _    (l:)     m:  (%>:) %^COMPDISIMP3: e: ;!%> =morfemgrense

              [e:|u:] _   Cns+      %»:                             %^didhUML: e [d|l] ;
                      _ %^PLCDISIMP:   ;
                      _ %>: %^ILLELA:  ;

           !Last context above: Der/didh Umlaut for GUARKEDH-words Column 4 ea:ïe
           ! and Column 7 ua:oe part 2

!!€ aatskad%>%^DISIMPem
!!€ aatsked%>0em

!!$ aatskad%>%^DISIMPem
!!$ aatskad%>0em

!!€ daktare%>%^DISIMPm
!!€ daktere%>0m

!!$ daktare%>%^DISIMPm
!!$ daktare%>0m


!!€ gæhtja%>%^COMPDISIMPbe
!!€ gæhtje%>0be

!!$ gæhtja%>%^COMPDISIMPbe
!!$ gæhtja%>0be



"ä/e alternation"
ä:e <=> _ %>: %^ILLELA: [ s e | s n e | s t e ] ;

"á/e alternation"
á:e <=> _ %>: %^ILLELA: [ s e | s n e | s t e ] ;

"æ/e alternation"
æ:e <=> _ %>: %^ILLELA: [ s e | s n e | s t e ] ;

"ä/i alternation"
ä:i <=> _ %>: %^COMESS: [ n e | (i) j s t e | d e ] ;

"æ/i alternation"
æ:i <=> _ %>: %^COMESS: [ n e | (i) j s t e | d e ] ;

"á/i alternation"
á:i <=> _ %>: %^COMESS: [ n e | (i) j s t e | d e ] ;




"a/i alternation"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
a:i <=>   _ j (e) (%>:) %^DISIMP: ; ! Diftongforenkling  : Maana:maanine
       \i _        %>:  %^COMESS: ; ! a -> i, når det ikke er -i- i stammevokal


! No nouns following this pattern, see last part of §103 in Bergsland - ???

!!€ jåhtaj%^DISIMP%>em
!!€ jåhtij0%>em

!!$ jåhtaj%^DISIMP%>em
!!$ jåhtaj0%>em

"a/0 alternation"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
a:0 <=> i _ %>: %^COMESS:         ; ! a -> 0 når det finnes en -i- foran a: Moria --> Morine 
        

! Maja: Trigger1) Vi må også ha en trigger for PL_GEN og PL_GEN_Comitativ for e-propernouns. Ingej -> Ingi (som nïejte -niejti) og i PL_Comitativ blir det Ingigujmie (og ikke Ingejgujmie) + 'e' --> 'i' = Pl+Acc,Pl+Gen,Pl+Ill,Pl+Pl+Ine,Pl+Ela,Pl+Com

!+ Trigger2) som sier 'a' --> 'i' i Pl+Acc, Pl+Ill, Pl+Ine og Pl+Ela.

!+ Trigger3) (COMESS trigger as j") --> til også å gjelde for Pl+Acc,Pl+Gen,Pl+Ill,Pl+Ill,Pl+Ine,Pl+Com.


 !  "COMESS trigger as j"
!!! __@RULENAME@__  
!%^COMESS:j <=> [u | o] %>: _ ; ! etter en bakre, runda stammevokal skal det være en -j-

! SNM 13.12.2018: Commented out, this rule is not used anywhere, that is, there are no verbs with this mark.
! It was added in svn r16941, with this comment: Added diphtong alternation rules.
! "Even syllabic verbs Du1Pl3 e/oe V"
! ! __@RULENAME@__  
!   ':o <=> _ e: X2: Cns ;

"Even syllabic verbs Du3 e/i alternation V"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
!  e:0 <=>      ': _             X3:               ; !this must be e:i, subrule moved to next rule
  e:0 <=>  (%»:) i _ j (e) (%>:) %^NOMAGieDISIMP:     ([h|m|n|i|i g u j m i e]) ;
         i : _ %>: %^COMESS: ; ! e --> 0 , når -i i f.eks Morie i Comitativ. -> Morine
  
"Proper PlGen, PlCom"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  j:0 <=> e:i %>: %^PLGENPLCOM: _ ; ! -j- blir til 0, når -e- blir til -i-. da slår (%>) denne triggeren inn (%^PLGENPLCOM) : (NB!) i posisjonen etter -e- !! 



"Even syllabic verbs Du2, Du3, Pl1, Pl2 e/i class V" 
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  e:i <=> \[o|i] ( %>: ) _     X4:       j i [d|b] i e (n) ; ! Du2, Pl1, Pl2
          \[o|i] ( %>: ) _     X3:       j æ g a n         ; ! Du3
             \i          _ %>: %^COMESS:                   ; ! e --> i veksling i Com og Ess
             \i          _ %>: %^PLGENPLCOM:               ; ! e --> i i Pl+Gen og i Pl+Com


! € = positive-pairs-out
!!€ vååjn>eX4jibie
!!€ vååjn>i0jibie

! $ = negative-pairs-out
!!$ vååjn>eX4jibie
!!$ vååjn>e0jibie

!!€ vååjn>eX3jægan
!!€ vååjn>i0jægan

!!$ vååjn>eX3jægan
!!$ vååjn>e0jægan

!!€ juht»ieje%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPm
!!€ juht»i0je%>0m

!!$ juht»ieje%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPm
!!$ juht»ieje%>0m



!  This ruleset spoils oe:o DISIMP
!
!  "South - North Adjective comparative 1"
!  å:a <=> a: Cns* %>: _ b p o: e: ;
!
!  "South - North Adjective comparative 2"
!  o:a <=> a: Cns* %>: å: b p _ e: ;
!
!  "South - North Adjective comparative 3"
!  e:0 <=> a: Cns* %>: å: b p o: _ ;














! -----------------------
! New style Umlaut rules. 
! -----------------------

!Class Even I

! i:æ e:a ae:aa u:å 
! Pres Sg123
! V28, V30, V32, V36, V38, V40
! N §102

"Even syllabic verbs present sg, monophpt E I"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ #: | Cns+ ](%»:) _ Cns+ [
                                  [ Vow       %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] |
                                    %^aLATUS: %»:                             ] |
                                  [     ([%>:|%»:])                %^1UML:0   ] |
                                  [     (     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ]
                                ] ;
 	where Vx in (i e u)
 	      Vy in (æ a å)
 	matched ;
 

!THOM 2009-03-04: added #: in front of Cns+ in left-hand context because rule overgenerated to 3-syllable verbs, so we got goltelidh > goltalahtjedh. The change aimed to restrict the context to 2-syllable stems.
!THOM 2009-10-22: removed the #: in front of Cns+ in left-hand context beacause we got wrong analyze:vuesiehtimman instead of vuesiehtæmman. It does not seem to overgenerate to 3-syllable verbs anymore, so I leave it like this for now. 
! klihtie -> klæhtetje
!!€ kliht%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP
!!€ klæhte»tje0

! klæhtatjasse
!!€ kliht%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!!€ klæhta»tj%>asse

! jeptsie -> japtsetje
!!€ jepts%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP
!!€ japtse»tje0

! japtsatjasse
!!€ jepts%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!!€ japtsa»tj%>asse

! gullie -> gålletje
!!€ gull%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP
!!€ gålle»tje0

! gållatjasse
!!€ gull%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!!€ gålla»tj%>asse

!!€ biss%>%^1UMLam
!!€ bæss%>0am

!!€ belt%>%^1UMLam
!!€ balt%>0am

!!€ buhtj%>%^1UMLa
!!€ båhtj%>0a

!!€ paek%>%^1UMLa
!!€ paak%>0a

!!€ bået%>%^1UMLa
!!€ båat%>0a

!!€ buel%>%^1UMLa
!!€ bual%>0a

!!€ kliht%>%^1UMLan
!!€ klæht%>0an

!!€ jepts%>%^1UMLan
!!€ japts%>0an

!!€ gull%>%^1UMLan
!!€ gåll%>0an

!!€ gaevl%>%^1UMLan
!!€ gaavl%>0an
